District of Columbia statutes.
29-306.41

Functions of officers.

Each officer has the authority to, and shall, perform:

(1)

The functions set forth in the bylaws; or

(2)

To the extent consistent with the bylaws, the functions prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the functions of other officers.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720